src-fst-morphology-kawe-root.lexc.md
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Mohawk LANGUAGE.

first attempt to model simplest form of mohawk verbs:
personal prefix + root
https://giellalt.uit.no/lang/common/MorphologicalTags.html
extra tages are listed below

# Multichar_Symbols definitions
I-> X
you-> X
he -> X
she/smb/they -> X
it -> X
you and I -> X
smb and I -> X
you two -> X
two males or mixed -> X
two females -> X
you all and I -> X
they all and I -> X
you all
they all (male or mixed) -> X
they all (female) -> X
X -> I
X -> you
X -> he 
X -> she/smb/they 
X -> it 
X -> you and I
X -> smb and I 
X -> you two 
X -> two males or mixed 
X -> two females
X -> you all and I 
X -> they all and I 
X -> you all
X -> they all (male or mixed) 
X -> they all (female) 
Active voice, Red verbs
Passive voice, Blue verbs
Transitive verbs, Purple verbs
dualistic prefix integral to some verbs
a special pseudo-type to allow red verbs take blue prefixes in Perfective aspect
disallow red prefixes in Perfective aspect
The following are verb conjugation classes, one through 9, plus Exceptions class

start of personal prefix boundary  
start of the root morpheme  
marks verbs the start of Habitual suffix
marks verbs the start of Perfective suffix
marks verbs the start of Habitual suffix
marks verbs the start of Command suffix (usually none)
marks verbs the start of Future prefix
marks verbs the start of Conditional prefix
marks verbs the start of Past prefix
marks hidden h that only appears in certain circumstances
marks the te- part of te-verbs
marks the te- part of ni-verbs

The word forms in UNDEFINED language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/kawe-root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-moh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/kawe-root.lexc)</small>

---
